Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.200

Pesticide dealer manager—License qualifications.

The director shall require each pesticide dealer manager to demonstrate to the director knowledge of pesticide laws and rules; pesticide hazards; and the safe distribution, use and application, and disposal of pesticides by satisfactorily passing a written examination after which the director shall issue a license of qualification. Application for a license must be accompanied by a fee of thirty-eight dollars. The pesticide dealer manager license expires annually on a date set by rule by the director.

[ 2021 c 244 s 3; 2008 c 285 s 17; 1997 c 242 s 5; 1992 c 170 s 2; 1991 c 109 s 38; 1989 c 380 s 15; 1981 c 297 s 19; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.